District of Columbia statutes.
1-819.01

Coordination between Secretary, Trustee, and District Government.

The Secretary, Trustee, and District Government shall carry out responsibilities under this chapter and under the contract in a manner which promotes the cost-effective and efficient administration of benefit payments under the District Retirement Programs, and in a manner which avoids unnecessary interruptions and delays in paying individuals the full benefits to which they are entitled under such Programs.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 729, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11091
renumbered as § 11081, Dec. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 3966, Pub. L. 108-489, § 2(a)(1), (2)
2001 Ed., § 1-817.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-769.1.
Former 1-819.01 has been recodified as § 1-821.01.